Washington statutes.
RCW 2.12.050

Judges' retirement fund—Created—Contents—Custodian—Records.

There is hereby created a fund in the state treasury to be known as "The Judges' Retirement Fund" which shall consist of the moneys appropriated from the general fund in the state treasury, as hereinafter provided; the deductions from salaries of judges, as hereinafter provided, all gifts, donations, bequests and devises made for the benefit of said fund, and the rents, issues and profits thereof, or proceeds of sales of assets thereof. The state treasurer shall be treasurer, ex officio, of this fund. The treasurer shall be custodian of the moneys in said judges' retirement fund. The department of retirement systems shall receive all moneys payable into said fund and make disbursements therefrom as provided in this chapter. The department shall keep written permanent records showing all receipts and disbursements of said fund.

[ 1982 1st ex.s. c 52 s 4; 1977 c 75 s 1; 1977 c 18 s 1; 1967 c 28 s 1; 1959 c 192 s 1; 1937 c 229 s 5; RRS s 11054-5.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—1982 1st ex.s. c 52: See note following RCW 2.10.180.